Montana, session 2025, SB366.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 13-38-205, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-38-205. Organization and operation of county and city central committees. (1) The county
central committee shall meet prior to the state convention of its political party and organize by electing a
presiding officer and one or more vice presiding officers. The gender of the presiding officer and the vice
presiding officer may not be the same. The county central committee shall elect a secretary and other officers
as necessary. It is not necessary for the officers to be precinct committee representatives.
(2) The committee may select managing or executive committees and authorize subcommittees to
exercise all powers conferred upon the county, city, state, and congressional central committees by the election
laws of this state.
(3) The presiding officer of the county central committee shall call the county convention and not
less than 4 days before the date of the county convention shall publish the call in a newspaper published at the
county seat and mail or e-mail a copy of the call to each precinct committee representative. If party rules permit
the use of a proxy, a proxy may not be recognized unless it is held by an elector of the precinct of the
committee representative executing it.
(4) The county presiding officer of the party shall preside at the county convention. No person
other than a duly elected or appointed committee representative or officer of the committee is entitled to
participate in the proceedings of the committee.
(5) If a committee representative is absent, the convention may fill the vacancy by appointing some
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 366
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 366
qualified elector of the party, resident in the precinct, to represent the precinct in the convention.
(6) The county convention shall elect delegates and alternate delegates to the state convention
under rules of the state party. The presiding officer and secretary of the county convention shall issue and sign
certificates of election of the delegates."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 366
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 366, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 366
INTRODUCED BY M. REGIER
AN ACT REVISING THE CENTRAL COMMITTEE COUNTY CONVENTION NOTIFICATION PROCESS;
ALLOWING NOTIFICATION OF THE CALL OF THE COUNTY CONVENTION TO BE E-MAILED TO
COMMITTEE REPRESENTATIVES; AND AMENDING SECTION 13-38-205, MCA.”